src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection and derivation




!! ## Noun stem variation and allomorph selection
!!  The nominal stems were classified according to what is the stem variation
!!  and what allomorphs they select. This section lists all the possible
!!  variations and all their allomorph selections. Each class description
!!  gives the key forms that can be used when classifying new words, the
!!  examples of inflection and negative examples for the most obvious missed
!!  allomorphs and differentiating factors. The example list should be at
!!  least:
!!  singular nominative, singular essive, singular inessive, plural essive,
!!  plural elative, singular partitives, singular illatives, plural partitives
!!  plural GENITIVEs, plural illatives and the compound forms.
!!

!! ### Noun stems without stem variation
LEXICON NOUN_TALO
!!  The most basic noun stem does not have any stem internal variation and
!!  uses few commonest allomorphs. The words in this class are either
!!  bisyllabic or have one of common derivational suffixes: sto, ....
!!  The nouns in this class end in o, u, y or ö, which determines their
!!  illative suffix and therefore exact classification:
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 1o
!!€  talo: talo+N+Sg+Nom # house
!!€  talona: talo+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  talossa: talo+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  taloina: talo+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  taloista: talo+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  taloa: talo+N+Sg+Par
!!$  talota: talo+N+Sg+Par
!!€  taloon: talo+N+Sg+Ill
!!$  taloseen: talo+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  taloja: talo+N+Pl+Par
!!$  taloita: talo+N+Pl+Par
!!€  talojen: talo+N+Pl+Gen
!!$  taloiden: talo+N+Pl+Gen
!!$  taloitten: talo+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  taloihin: talo+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  talojuttu: talo+N+Sg+Nom#juttu+N+Sg+Nom # house thing
!!€  talonjuttu: talo+N+Sg+Gen#juttu+N+Sg+Nom # house’s thing
!!€  talojenjuttu: talo+N+Pl+Gen#juttu+N+Sg+Nom # houses’ thing
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 1o non-standard
!!€  taloin: talo+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  talohon: talo+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON  ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON NOUN_ASU
!!  The stems ending in u are also without variationm and the bisyllabic ones
!!  have the same simple allomorph pattern:
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 1u
!!€  asu: asu+N+Sg+Nom # outfit
!!€  asua: asu+N+Sg+Par
!!€  asuun: asu+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  asuna: asu+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  asussa: asu+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  asuja: asu+N+Pl+Par
!!€  asujen: asu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  asuihin: asu+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  asuina: asu+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  asuissa: asu+N+Pl+Ine
0  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
!+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 1u non-standard
!!€  asuin: asu+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  asuhun: asu+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ; ! in NS's intro prose



LEXICON NOUN_KÄRRY
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 1y
!!€  kärry: kärry+N+Sg+Nom # cart
!!€  kärryä: kärry+N+Sg+Par
!!€  kärryyn: kärry+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  kärrynä: kärry+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  kärryssä: kärry+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  kärryjä: kärry+N+Pl+Par
!!€  kärryjen: kärry+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  kärryihin: kärry+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  kärryinä: kärry+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  kärryissä: kärry+N+Pl+Ine
0  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 1y non-standard
!!€  kärryin: kärry+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  kärryhyn: kärry+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON NOUN_MÖMMÖ
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 1ö
!!€  mömmö: mömmö+N+Sg+Nom # gunk
!!€  mömmöä: mömmö+N+Sg+Par
!!€  mömmöön: mömmö+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  mömmönä: mömmö+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  mömmössä: mömmö+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  mömmöjä: mömmö+N+Pl+Par
!!€  mömmöjen: mömmö+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  mömmöihin: mömmö+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  mömmöinä: mömmö+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  mömmöissä: mömmö+N+Pl+Ine
0  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 1ö non-standard
!!€  mömmöin: mömmö+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  mömmöhön: mömmö+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN  ; ! in NS's intro prose

!! ### Basic gradation cases
!!  The basic stems without variations other than consonant gradation.
LEXICON NOUN_UKKO
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 1ko
!!€  ukko: ukko+N+Sg+Nom # geezer
!!€  ukossa: ukko+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  ukoista: ukko+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  ukkoihin: ukko+N+Pl+Ill
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 1ko non-standard
!!€  ukkoin: ukko+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  ukkohon: ukko+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON  ; ! in NS's intro prose


LEXICON NOUN_TIKKU
!!€gt-norm:  Nouns 1ku
!!€  tikku: tikku+N+Sg+Nom # stick
!!€  tikussa: tikku+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  tikuista: tikku+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  tikkuihin: tikku+N+Pl+Ill
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ku  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ku  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:u  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ku  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
!!€gt-desc:  Nouns 1ku non-standard
!!€  tikkuin: tikku+N+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  tikkuhun: tikku+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill
+Use/Rare:ku  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ; ! in NS parenthesised
+Err/Orth:ku  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN  ; ! in NS's intro prose

LEXICON NOUN_ALKU

:ku  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:ku  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
:ku  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
:ku  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;

:u  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
:u  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
:u  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
