src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
alku+N:al  NOUN_ALKU  ;
arkkiveisu+N:arkki#veisu  NOUN_ASU  ;
asekätkö+N:asekätkö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
asiahakemisto+N:asia#hakemisto  NOUN_TALO  ;
auringonpilkku+N:auringon#pilk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
bulimikko+N:bulimik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
CD-ROM-levy+N:CD-ROM-levy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
enemmistö+N:enemmistö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
ennätysjuoksu+N:ennätysjuoksu  NOUN_ASU  ;
erikoisajoneuvo+N:erikois#ajo#neuvo NOUN_TALO ;
harhapolku+N:harha#pol  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
hätälasku+N:hätälasku  NOUN_ASU  ;
haudanryöstö+N:haudanryöstö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
hellemekko+N:hellemek  NOUN_UKKO  ;
hernepyssy+N:hernepyssy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
hiligaino+N:hiligaino  NOUN_TALO  ;
hinauspolku+N:hinauspol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
hörhö+N:hörhö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
hutu+N:hutu  NOUN_ASU  ;
ikkunaluukku+N:ikkunaluuk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
ilmasulku+N:ilmasul  NOUN_ALKU  ;
intianriikinkukko+N:intianriikinkuk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
isännistö+N:isännistö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
itämyrsky+N:itä#myrsky  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
jalkajarru+N:jalka#jarru  NOUN_ASU  ;
järjestelmäkello+N:järjestelmä#kello  NOUN_TALO  ;
juovapääsirkku+N:juovapää#sirk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
juustonkuivausverkko+N:juustonkuivaus#verk NOUN_UKKO ;
kääpiökasvu+N:kääpiökasvu  NOUN_ASU  ;
kahlaajapääsky+N:kahlaajapääsky  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
käpykakku+N:käpykak  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
karjapolku+N:karjapol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
karvalakkilähetystö+N:karvalakki#lähetystö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
karvanpoisto+N:karvan#poisto  NOUN_TALO  ;
käsivarsilukko+N:käsi#varsi#luk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
kauttakulku+N:kauttakul  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
kävelypolku+N:kävely#pol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
kerroskasvu+N:kerroskasvu  NOUN_ASU  ;
kiilalevy+N:kiilalevy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
kinttupolku+N:kinttu#pol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
kipusisko+N:kipu#sisko  NOUN_TALO  ;
kirjalaukku+N:kirjalauk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
kitkasähkö+N:kitka#sähkö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
kleptomaanikko+N:kleptomaanik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
kovalyijy+N:kova#lyijy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
kukkaruukku+N:kukkaruuk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
kukkavihko+N:kukkavihko  NOUN_TALO  ;
kuljetusvaunu+N:kuljetusvaunu  NOUN_ASU  ;
laapispuikko+N:laapispuik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
lämpösähkö+N:lämpösähkö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
länsimyrsky+N:länsi#myrsky  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
läpikulku+N:läpikul  NOUN_ALKU  ;
lapsiporno+N:lapsiporno  NOUN_TALO  ;
linnareissu+N:linnareissu  NOUN_ASU  ;
liukupolku+N:liukupol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
lukinverkko+N:lukinverk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
lumikinkku+N:lumikink  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
luokkaero+N:luokka#ero  NOUN_TALO  ;
lypsy+N:lypsy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
maitopystö+N:maitopystö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
merenkulku+N:merenkul  NOUN_ALKU  ;
merkintälasku+N:merkintälasku  NOUN_ASU  ;
miero+N:miero  NOUN_TALO  ;
miljoonikko+N:miljoonik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
ministerinsalkku+N:ministerinsalk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
mylly+N:mylly  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
näppäimistö+N:näppäimistö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
norsunluurannikonkoro+N:norsunluurannikonkoro  NOUN_TALO  ;
nuottivihko+N:nuottivih  NOUN_UKKO  ;
ohimopoimu+N:ohimopoimu  NOUN_ASU  ;
oikopolku+N:oikopol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
ongenkoukku+N:ongenkouk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
päätelevy+N:pääte#levy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
päivänvalo+N:päivänvalo  NOUN_TALO  ;
parkkipirkko+N:parkkipirk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
perunankylvö+N:perunankylvö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
pianokoulu+N:pianokoulu  NOUN_ASU  ;
pilviverho+N:pilviverho  NOUN_TALO  ;
platy+N:platy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
pohjansirkku+N:pohjan#sirk NOUN_TIKKU ;
polku+N:pol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
postinjakeluverkko+N:postin#jakelu#verk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
puutalo+N:puu#talo  NOUN_TALO  ;
pysäköintivirhemaksu+N:pysäköintivirhemaksu  NOUN_ASU  ;
raastemylly+N:raaste#mylly  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
rahansäästö+N:rahansäästö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
ratsastuspolku+N:ratsastuspol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
rättimikko+N:rättimik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
rommikakku+N:rommikak  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
ruumisauto+N:ruumis#auto  NOUN_TALO  ;
rypsiöljy+N:rypsi#öljy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
sähköviulu+N:sähkö#viulu  NOUN_ASU  ;
sairaalapöpö+N:sairaalapöpö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
salvokukko+N:salvokuk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
saunapolku+N:saunapol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
sijoiltaanmeno+N:sijoiltaanmeno  NOUN_TALO  ;
sivulaukku+N:sivu#lauk  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
skandaalinkäry+N:skandaalin#käry  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
sukupuolisolu+N:suku#puoli#solu  NOUN_ASU  ;
syrjäpolku+N:syrjä#pol  NOUN_ALKU  ;
syyttäjistö+N:syyttäjistö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
teekakku+N:teekak  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
termostaattilevy+N:termostaattilevy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
tiedonsiirtoverkko+N:tiedonsiirtoverk  NOUN_UKKO  ;
tiesulku+N:tiesul  NOUN_ALKU  ;
tiivistemehu+N:tiiviste#mehu  NOUN_ASU  ;
törmäysauto+N:törmäysauto  NOUN_TALO  ;
tornipöllö+N:torni#pöllö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
työnsulku+N:työnsul  NOUN_ALKU  ;
untuvatyyny+N:untuva#tyyny  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
vakokylvö+N:vakokylvö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
valkosolu+N:valkosolu  NOUN_ASU  ;
valkuaiskakku+N:valkuais#kak  NOUN_TIKKU  ;
vararikko+N:vara#rik  NOUN_UKKO  ;
vesipyssy+N:vesi#pyssy  NOUN_KÄRRY  ;
vibrato+N:vibrato  NOUN_TALO  ;
voittokulku+N:voittokul  NOUN_ALKU  ;
vuosimaksu+N:vuosi#maksu  NOUN_ASU  ;
ydinsähkö+N:ydinsähkö  NOUN_MÖMMÖ  ;
mustatokko+N:musta#tok NOUN_UKKO ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
pikku-uikku+N:pikku-#uik NOUN_TIKKU ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
